Tennessee, session 114, HB0788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-336(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) Notwithstanding § 55-50-323, a photo identification license issued pursuant
to this section must be provided free of charge to a person if the person signs an
affidavit stating the person does not have a valid government-issued photo identification.
Such free photo identification licenses must be made available at each location in this
state where the department issues a driver license or photo identification license.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (e), a photo identification license may be issued
to a person who meets the criteria of subdivision (g)(1) even if the person has a valid
non-photo-bearing driver license.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0788
002902
- 1 -